sk-SK: Veľkosť obalu na karty/kompatibilita formátov: Spoločenská hra (veľké); Spoločenská hra (malé); Spoločenská hra (štandard); Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Vlastné/neštandardné; Japonské/malé (napr.; Mini/Euro mini; Viac veľkostí/nastaviteľné; Oversize; Štvorec; Štandard/Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Iné
tr: Kart kılıfı boyutu/formatı uyumluluğu: Kutu oyunu (büyük); Kutu oyunu (küçük); Kutu oyunu (standart); Briç (2,25" x 3,5"); Özel / standart dışı; Japon / küçük (örn.; Mini / Euro mini; Çok boyutlu / ayarlanabilir; Büyük boy; Kare; Standart / poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Diğer
de: Größen-/Formatkompatibilität der Kartenhüllen: Brettspiel groß; Brettspiel klein; Brettspiel Standard; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Benutzerdefiniert / Sonderformat; Japanisch / Klein (z. B.; Mini / Euro Mini; Mehrere Größen / anpassbar; Übergröße; Quadratisch; Standard / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Sonstige
da: Kompatibilitet med kortlommers størrelse/format: Brætspil (stort); Brætspil (lille); Brætspil (standard); Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Specialtilpasset/ikke-standard; Japansk/lille (f.eks.; Mini / Euro mini; Flere størrelser/justerbar; Oversize; Kvadratisk; Standard/Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Andet
pt-PT: Tamanho do protetor de cartas/compatibilidade de formato: Jogo de tabuleiro grande; Jogo de tabuleiro pequeno; Jogo de tabuleiro padrão; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personalizado/não padrão; Japonês/pequeno (por ex. Yu-Gi-Oh!); Mini/Euro mini; Vários tamanhos/ajustável; Tamanho grande; Quadrado; Padrão/poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Outro
bg-BG: Съвместимост по размер/формат на протекторите за карти: Голям за настолна игра; Малък за настолна игра; Стандартен за настолна игра; Бридж (2,25" x 3,5"); Персонализиран/нестандартен; Японски / малък (напр.; Мини / евро мини; Многоразмерен/регулируем; Голям размер; Квадратен; Стандартен / покер (2,5" x 3,5"); Таро; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Друго
ro-RO: Compatibilitate dimensiune/format manșetă carte: Joc de societate mare; Joc de societate mic; Joc de societate standard; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personalizat / non-standard; Japonez / Mic (de ex.; Mini / Euro mini; Multidimensiune / ajustabil; Supradimensionat; Pătrat; Standard / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Altele
ja: カードスリーブのサイズ／フォーマットの互換性: ボードゲーム ラージ; ボードゲーム スモール; ボードゲーム スタンダード; ブリッジ (2.25インチ x 3.5インチ); カスタム/非標準; ジャパニーズ / スモール (例:; ミニ/ユーロミニ; マルチサイズ/調整可能; オーバーサイズ; スクエア; スタンダード/ポーカー (2.5インチ x 3.5インチ); タロット; 遊戯王); その他
ko: 카드슬리브 크기/형식 호환성: 보드게임 라지; 보드게임 스몰; 보드게임 스탠다드; 브릿지(2.25" x 3.5"); 맞춤/비표준; 일본형/소형(예:; 미니/유로 미니; 멀티 사이즈/조절 가능; 오버사이즈; 정사각형; 스탠다드/포커(2.5" x 3.5"); 타로; 유희왕!); 기타
hu: Kártyatok méret / formátum kompatibilitása: Társasjáték (nagy); Társasjáték (kicsi); Társasjáték (standard); Bridzs (2.25" x 3.5"); Egyedi / nem szabványos; Japán / kicsi (pl.; Mini / Euro mini; Többméretes / állítható; Túlméretes; Négyzetes; Standard / Póker (2.5" x 3.5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Egyéb
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de tamanho/formato das capas para cartas: Jogo de tabuleiro grande; Jogo de tabuleiro pequeno; Jogo de tabuleiro padrão; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personalizado / não padrão; Japonês / Pequeno (ex.:; Mini / Euro mini; Tamanho múltiplo / ajustável; Oversized; Quadrado; Padrão / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarô; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Outro
ru: Совместимость протекторов для карточек по размеру/формату: Для настольных игр (большой); Для настольных игр (малый); Для настольных игр (стандартный); Бридж (2,25 х 3,5 дюйма); Нестандартный; Японский / Малый (напр.,; Мини / Евро-мини; Разных размеров / Регулируемый; Увеличенного размера; Квадратный; Стандартный / Покер (2,5 x 3,5 дюйма); Таро; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Другое
lt-LT: Kortelių dėklo dydžio / formato suderinamumas: Stalo žaidimų, didelis; Stalo žaidimų, mažas; Stalo žaidimų, standartinis; Bridžo (2,25" x 3,5"); Pasirinktinis / nestandartinis; Japoniškas / mažas (pvz.; Mini / „Euro mini“; Kelių dydžių / reguliuojamas; Padidintas; Kvadratinis; Standartinis / pokerio (2,5" x 3,5"); Taro; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Kita
es: Tamaño/formato de compatibilidad de las fundas para cartas: Juego de mesa grande; Juego de mesa pequeño; Juego de mesa estándar; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personalizado / no estándar; Japonés / Pequeño (p. ej.,; Mini / Euro mini; Multitalla / ajustable; Extragrande; Cuadrado; Estándar / Póquer (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Otro
fi: Korttisuojan koko / formaatin yhteensopivuus: Lautapeli, suuri; Lautapeli, pieni; Lautapeli, vakio; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Mukautettu / ei-vakio; Japanilainen / pieni (esim.; Mini / Euro mini; Monikokoinen / säädettävä; Ylisuuri; Neliö; Vakio / Pokeri (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Muu
sl-SI: Velikost/združljivost formata ovitka kartice: Družabne igre (velike); Družabne igre (majhne); Družabne igre (standardne); Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Po meri / nestandardno; Japonske / majhne (npr.; Mini / Euro mini; Več velikosti / prilagodljivo; Zelo velike (oversized); Kvadratne; Standardne / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Drugo
zh-CN: 卡牌保护套尺寸/格式兼容性: 大号桌游卡; 小号桌游卡; 标准桌游卡; 桥牌尺寸（2.25" x 3.5"）; 自定义/非标准; 日标/小号（例如; 迷你/欧标迷你; 多尺寸/可调节; 超大号; 方形; 标准/扑克尺寸（2.5" x 3.5"）; 塔罗牌尺寸; 游戏王！）; 其他
en: Card sleeve size / format compatibility: Board-game large; Board-game small; Board-game standard; Bridge (2.25" x 3.5"); Custom / non-standard; Japanese / Small (e.g.; Mini / Euro mini; Multi-size / adjustable; Oversized; Square; Standard / Poker (2.5" x 3.5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Other
el: Συμβατότητα μεγέθους/μορφής θήκης καρτών: Μεγάλο (για επιτραπέζια); Μικρό (για επιτραπέζια); Κανονικό (για επιτραπέζια); Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Προσαρμοσμένο / μη τυπικό; Ιαπωνικό / Μικρό (π.χ.; Mini / Euro mini; Πολλαπλών μεγεθών / ρυθμιζόμενο; Υπερμεγέθες; Τετράγωνο; Κανονικό / Πόκερ (2,5" x 3,5"); Ταρώ; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilność rozmiaru/formatu koszulek na karty: Duże gry planszowe; Małe gry planszowe; Standardowe gry planszowe; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Niestandardowy; Japoński / Mały (np.; Mini / Euro mini; Wielorozmiarowy / regulowany; Nadwymiarowy; Kwadratowy; Standard / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Inne
fr: Compatibilité des pochettes avec les tailles et formats de cartes: Grand jeu de société; Petit jeu de société; Jeu de société standard; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personnalisé / non standard; Japonais / petit (par ex.; Mini / Euro mini; Multitaille / ajustable; Surdimensionné; Carré; Standard / poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Autre
vi: Kích thước/định dạng tương thích của bao đựng thẻ: Board game cỡ lớn; Board game cỡ nhỏ; Board game tiêu chuẩn; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Tùy chỉnh / không tiêu chuẩn; Nhật Bản / Nhỏ (vd:; Mini / Euro mini; Nhiều cỡ / có thể điều chỉnh; Quá cỡ; Vuông; Tiêu chuẩn / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Khác
nb: Kortsleevestørrelse/formatkompatibilitet: Brettspill (stor); Brettspill (liten); Brettspill (standard); Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Egendefinert / ikke-standard; Japansk / liten (f.eks.; Mini / Euro mini; Flere størrelser / justerbar; Ekstra stor; Kvadratisk; Standard / poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Annet
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličine/ formata čahure kartice: Velike za društvene igre; Male za društvene igre; Standardne za društvene igre; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Prilagođeno / nestandardno; Japanske / male (npr.; Mini / Euro mini; Više veličina / podesivo; Predimenzionirano; Kvadratne; Standardne / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Ostalo
nl: Kaart hoesje maat / formaat compatibiliteit: Bordspel groot; Bordspel klein; Bordspel standaard; Bridge (2.25" x 3.5"); Aangepast / afwijkende maat; Japans / Klein (bijv.; Mini / Euro mini; Meerdere maten / verstelbaar; Oversized; Vierkant; Standaard / Poker (2.5" x 3.5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Overige
th: ขนาดซองไพ่/ความเข้ากันได้กับรูปแบบไพ่: บอร์ดเกมขนาดใหญ่; บอร์ดเกมขนาดเล็ก; บอร์ดเกมมาตรฐาน; บริดจ์ (2.25" x 3.5"); กำหนดเอง / นอกมาตรฐาน; ญี่ปุ่น / ขนาดเล็ก (เช่น; มินิ / ยูโรมินิ; หลายขนาด / ปรับได้; โอเวอร์ไซส์; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; มาตรฐาน / โป๊กเกอร์ (2.5" x 3.5"); ทาโรต์; ยูกิโอ!); อื่นๆ
it: Compatibilità formato/formato della custodia per carte: Gioco da tavolo grande; Gioco da tavolo piccolo; Gioco da tavolo standard; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Personalizzato / non standard; Giapponese / Piccola (es.; Mini / Euro mini; Multimisura / regolabile; Oversize; Quadrata; Standard / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarocchi; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Altro
cs: Velikost obalů na karty / kompatibilita formátu: Velká desková hra; Malá desková hra; Standardní desková hra; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Vlastní / nestandardní; Japonské / malé (např.; Mini / Euro mini; Více velikostí / nastavitelné; Nadměrné; Čtvercové; Standardní / Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarotové; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Jiné
sv: Kortfodralets storlek/formatkompatibilitet: Brädspel stor; Brädspel liten; Brädspel standard; Bridge (2,25" x 3,5"); Anpassad/icke-standard; Japansk/liten (t.ex.; Mini/Euro-mini; Flera storlekar/justerbar; Extra stor; Kvadratisk; Standard/Poker (2,5" x 3,5"); Tarot; Yu-Gi-Oh!); Annat
zh-TW: 卡套尺寸 / 格式相容性: 大型桌遊卡; 小型桌遊卡; 標準桌遊卡; 橋牌卡 (2.25" x 3.5"); 自訂 / 非標準; 日式 / 小型 (例如; 迷你 / 歐式迷你; 多種尺寸 / 可調式; 超大尺寸; 方形; 標準 / 撲克牌 (2.5" x 3.5"); 塔羅牌; 遊戲王！); 其他